Massachusetts, session 194th, S2386.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after Section 6C the following:-
Section 6D: The registrar, upon payment of the fee required in Section thirty-three, shall
furnish to members of any municipal fire department, or members retired in good standing, a
special distinctive firefighter motorcycle license plate for use on private motorcycles owned and
operated by such firefighter. No such firefighter motorcycle license plate shall be issued or
renewed until proper certification has been made to the registrar by the head of the fire
department that the applicant is or was a member of the fire department.
of 2

In addition to the fee required in Section thirty-three, there shall be an additional fee of
ten dollars for the issuance and renewal of such firefighter motorcycle license plate to be
collected by the registrar and paid to the Massachusetts Firefighters Academy Trust Fund
pursuant to Section 165A of Chapter 6 of the General Laws.
of 2